North Dakota statutes. TITLE 54 State Government
CHAPTER 54-62 Faith-Based And Community Initiatives

54-62-01.
Office of faith-based and community initiatives established.

The office of faith-based and community initiatives is established within the department of commerce. The office of faith-based and community initiatives has lead responsibility to establish policies, priorities, and objectives for the state’s comprehensive effort to enlist, equip, enable, empower, and expand the work of faith-based and community organizations to the extent permitted by law. The commissioner of the department of commerce shall designate a member of the department of commerce staff to serve as director of the office of faith-based and community initiatives. The department of commerce shall provide other staff services to assist the director.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 539, § 1; 2007, ch. 28, § 8.

54-62-02.
Functions.

The principal functions of the office of faith-based and community initiatives are to:

Develop, lead, and coordinate the state’s policy agenda affecting faith-based and community programs and initiatives; expand the role of those efforts in communities; and increase their capacity through executive action, legislation, federal and private funding, and regulatory relief;

Coordinate public education activities designed to mobilize public support for faith-based and community initiatives through volunteerism, special projects, demonstration pilots, and public and private partnerships;

Encourage private charitable giving to support faith-based and community initiatives;

Bring concerns, ideas, and policy options to the governor and legislative assembly for assisting, strengthening, and replicating successful faith-based and community programs;

Provide policy and legal education to state, local, and community policymakers and public officials seeking ways to empower faith-based and community organizations and to improve the opportunities, capacity, and expertise of those groups;

Develop and implement strategic initiatives to strengthen the institutions of civil society and the state’s families and communities;

Encourage innovative grassroots, nonprofit organizations, and civic initiatives; and

Ensure that the efforts of faith-based and community organizations meet high standards of excellence and accountability.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 539, § 2.

54-62-03.
Advisory commission. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 177, § 4.

Effective Date.

The repeal of this section by section 4 of chapter 177, S.L. 2013 became effective August 1, 2013.